Massachusetts, session 194th, H2574.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 7B of Chapter 90 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting the following clauses:
(19) as of September 1, 2027, every school bus transporting students to or from a public,
charter or vocational school shall be equipped with a lap-shoulder belt for each permanent
seating accommodation designed and installed in compliance with United States motor vehicle
D.O.T. safety standards, which seat belt shall be always fastened about each passenger during
vehicle operation.
(20) as of September 1, 2027, every school bus transporting students to or from a private
or parochial school shall be equipped with a lap-shoulder belt for each permanent seating
of 3

accommodation designed and installed in compliance with United States motor vehicle D.O.T.
safety standards, which seat belt shall be fastened about each passenger at all times during
vehicle operation.
SECTION 2. Section 7B of said chapter 90, as so appearing, is hereby further amended
by inserting after the word “practices”, in line 120, the following words:
“, which shall include instruction in the use of lap-shoulder belts,”
SECTION 3. Section 7L of said chapter 90, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
inserting after the word “seated”, in line 6, the following words: -
“And, if traveling in a bus required by this chapter to have lap-shoulder belts, wearing a
lap-shoulder belt which is properly adjusted and fastened according to the manufacturer’s
instructions”.
SECTION 4. Section 7AA of said chapter 90, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
inserting after the word “bus”, in line 12, the following words: -
“, prior to September 1, 2026, unless such school bus is equipped with a lap-shoulder belt
system”.
SECTION 5. Section 4 of chapter 175E, as so appearing, is hereby amended, by adding
the following subsection:
(f) For motor vehicle insurance rates for school buses, the commissioner shall develop
and promulgate a schedule of appropriate reductions in premium charges to account for the
decreased risk of injury associated with the installation of a lap-shoulder belt system approved by
the National Highway Transportation Safety Administration in any such bus so equipped. The
of 3

schedule shall be promulgated prior to September 1, 2025, provided that an owner of any school
bus so equipped prior to the promulgation of said schedule may apply to the commissioner and
receive an appropriate reduction in the premium charge.
of 3